Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. Generally

§§ 35-7-301 through 35-7-312.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 35, § 120, Laws 1884, ch. 2, §§ 2 and 3, and Laws 1911, ch. 104, §§ 6, 8, 9, 12 through 16, and 18, related to general provisions on adulterated or misbranded food or drugs.